Massachusetts, session 194th, H4104.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation shall establish a sick leave bank for Daniel Yender, an employee
of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation. Any employee of the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation
days to the sick leave bank for use by Daniel Yender. If Daniel Yender terminates employment
with the Massachusetts Department of Transportation or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank,
any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank.
Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that
of 2

necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation.
of 2